Illinois, session 104th, SB3380.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Automatic Contract Renewal Act is amended 5by changing Sections 5 and 10 as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 601/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:8    "Automatic renewal offer terms" means the following clear 9and conspicuous disclosures:10        (1) that the paid subscription or purchasing agreement 11    will continue until the consumer cancels;12        (2) the timeframe in which the consumer must cancel in 13    order to avoid being charged for a subsequent term;14        (3) the recurring charges that will be charged to the 15    consumer's credit or debit card or payment account with a 16    third party as part of the automatic renewal contract, and 17    that the amount of the charge may change, if that is the 18    case, and the amount to which the charge will change, if 19    known;20        (4) the length of the automatic renewal term or that 21    the service is continuous, unless the length of the term 22    is chosen by the consumer; and23        (5) the minimum purchase obligation, if any.  SB3380- 2 -LRB104 19662 SPS 33111 b1    "Clear and conspicuous" means in larger type than the 2surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to 3the surrounding text of the same size, or set off from the 4surrounding text of the same size by symbols or other marks, in 5a manner that clearly calls attention to the language. In the 6case of an audio disclosure, "clear and conspicuous" means in 7a volume and cadence sufficient to be readily audible and 8understandable. 9    "Contract" means a written agreement between 2 or more 10parties.11    "One-step online cancellation" means an online method of 12cancellation that does not require the consumer to take 13additional actions that obstruct or delay the consumer's 14ability to immediately terminate an automatic renewal contract 15or continuous service offer. 16    "Parties" includes individuals and other legal entities, 17but does not include the federal government, this State or 18another state, or a unit of local government.19(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 103-70, eff. 1-1-24.) 20    (815 ILCS 601/10)21    Sec. 10. Automatic renewal; requirements. 22    (a) Any person, firm, partnership, association, or 23corporation that sells or offers to sell any products or 24services to a consumer pursuant to a contract, where such 25contract automatically renews unless the consumer cancels the   SB3380- 3 -LRB104 19662 SPS 33111 b1contract, shall: 2        (i) disclose the automatic renewal offer terms clearly 3    and conspicuously in the contract before the subscription 4    or purchasing agreement is fulfilled and in visual 5    proximity, or in the case of an offer conveyed by voice, in 6    temporal proximity, to the request for consent to the 7    offer;8        (ii) not charge the consumer's credit or debit card or 9    other payment mechanism for an automatic renewal service 10    without first obtaining the consumer's consent to the 11    contract containing the automatic renewal offer terms;12        (iii) provide an acknowledgment that includes the 13    automatic renewal offer terms, cancellation policy, and 14    information regarding how to cancel, which may be 15    accomplished by linking to a resource that provides 16    instructions that account for different platforms and 17    services, in a manner that is capable of being retained by 18    the consumer; and19        (iv) if the offer includes a free gift or trial, 20    disclose how to cancel the contract, which may be 21    accomplished by linking to a resource that provides 22    instructions that account for different platforms and 23    services, and allow the consumer to cancel before the 24    consumer pays for the good or services; and . 25        (v) provide the consumer with the option to cancel the 26    contract, at any time, using a simple cancellation   SB3380- 4 -LRB104 19662 SPS 33111 b1    mechanism in the same medium that the consumer used to 2    consent to the contract containing the automatic renewal 3    offer terms. 4    An entity subject to this subsection shall provide a clear 5and conspicuous notice, in a manner that may be retained by the 6consumer, of any material change to the terms of the contract, 7including any price increase, at least 3 days prior to the 8change to the terms. The notice shall contain information 9concerning how to cancel the contract. If the notice is sent 10electronically, the notice shall include either a hyperlink 11that directs the consumer to a webpage containing the 12cancellation process or another reasonably accessible 13electronic method that directs the consumer to the 14cancellation process if no webpage exists.15    (a-5) Any person, firm, partnership, association, or 16corporation that sells or offers to sell any products or 17services to a consumer pursuant to a contract that includes a 18free trial or a promotional period of the product or service 19that lasts 15 days or longer, where such contract 20automatically renews unless the consumer cancels the contract, 21shall notify the consumer during the free trial or the 22promotional period no less than 3 days before the cancellation 23deadline as described by the automatic renewal offer terms. 24The person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation 25shall send the notice in a method in which the consumer is 26accustomed to interacting with the person, firm, partnership,   SB3380- 5 -LRB104 19662 SPS 33111 b1association, or corporation.2    (b) Any person, firm, partnership, association, or 3corporation that sells or offers to sell any products or 4services to a consumer pursuant to a contract, where such 5contract term is a specified term of 12 months or more, and 6where such contract automatically renews for a specified term 7of more than one month unless the consumer cancels the 8contract, shall notify the consumer in writing of the 9automatic renewal. Written notice shall be provided to the 10consumer no less than 30 days and no more than 60 days before 11the cancellation deadline pursuant to the automatic renewal 12offer terms. Such written notice shall disclose clearly and 13conspicuously, in a retainable form:14        (i) that unless the consumer cancels the contract it 15    will automatically renew;16        (ii) a mechanism for cancelling the contract, which 17    shall be offered in a manner in which the consumer 18    commonly interacts with the business; and 19        (iii) the deadline by which the consumer must cancel 20    in order to avoid being charged for a subsequent term. 21    (b-5) Any A person, firm, partnership, association, or 22corporation that sells or offers to sell any products or 23services to a consumer pursuant to a contract, where such 24contract automatically renews unless the consumer cancels the 25contract, shall provide the consumer with the ability to 26cancel or terminate the contract, at any time, using a simple,   SB3380- 6 -LRB104 19662 SPS 33111 b1easy-to-use cancellation mechanism through all mediums by 2which the seller allows a consumer to consent or agree to the 3contract makes an automatic renewal offer or continuous 4service offer online shall provide a toll-free telephone 5number, electronic mail address, a postal address if the 6seller directly bills the consumer, or another cost-effective, 7timely, and easy-to-use mechanism for cancellation that shall 8be described in the notice required in subsection (b). A 9consumer who accepts an automatic renewal or continuous 10service offer online must be allowed to terminate the 11automatic renewal or continuous service exclusively online, 12which may include a termination email formatted and provided 13by the business that a consumer can send to the business 14without additional information, or a link to a website or 15other online service consumers can use to cancel. 16    (b-15) An entity subject to the provisions of subsection 17(b-5) or (b-10) shall be deemed in compliance if the entity 18provides:19        (1) a hyperlink to a one-step online cancellation 20    process through a website or other online medium, or 21    through an electronic communication, and the hyperlink is:22            (A) located on the entity's website, in an 23        electronic device or service provided to the consumer, 24        or in an electronic communication to the consumer; and 25            (B) available to the consumer immediately after 26        the consumer completes a reasonable authentication   SB3380- 7 -LRB104 19662 SPS 33111 b1        protocol used solely to confirm that the consumer is 2        authorized to make changes to the account; or 3        (2) one of the following means if the consumer 4    consented to the automatic renewal contract offer through 5    means other than through an online medium:6            (A) an in-person mechanism for cancelling the 7        contract that is at a physical location where the 8        consumer regularly uses any goods or services that are 9        subject to the automatic renewal contract; or10            (B) a toll-free telephone number.11    If the entity provides a toll-free telephone number for 12cancelling the contract, the entity shall answer calls 13promptly during normal business hours and not obstruct or 14delay the consumer's ability to cancel. If a consumer leaves a 15voicemail with the entity requesting cancellation, the entity 16shall, within one business day, either process the requested 17cancellation or call the consumer back regarding the 18cancellation request. 19    (b-20) Notwithstanding the requirements set forth in 20subsection (b-15), if a consumer requests to cancel the 21contract, an entity may provide a discount offer, retention 22benefit, or other consumer benefit or inform the consumer of 23the effect of the cancellation, provided that the consumer 24remains able to terminate the automatic renewal contract.25    If a consumer requests to cancel online, the entity may 26display a discounted offer, retention benefit, other consumer   SB3380- 8 -LRB104 19662 SPS 33111 b1benefit, or information regarding the effects of cancellation, 2provided that the entity simultaneously continuously displays 3a prominently located direct link or button entitled "click to 4cancel", or words to that effect, with the presentation of the 5discounted offer, retention benefit, other consumer benefit, 6or information. If the consumer uses this direct link or 7button to cancel, the entity shall promptly process the 8cancellation and shall not otherwise obstruct or delay the 9consumer's ability to proceed with the cancellation.10    If a consumer requests to cancel by telephone, the entity 11may present the consumer with a discounted offer, retention 12benefit, other consumer benefit, or information regarding the 13effect of cancellation, provided that the entity first informs 14the consumer that they may complete the cancellation process 15at any time by stating that they want to "cancel", or words to 16that effect. If the consumer states the consumer's intention 17to "cancel", or words to that effect, the entity shall 18promptly process the cancellation and shall not otherwise 19obstruct or delay the consumer's ability to cancel. 20    An entity may require a consumer to enter account 21information or digitally authenticate the consumer's identity 22before terminating the contract online if the consumer has an 23account with the entity. A consumer who is unwilling or unable 24to enter account information or digitally authenticate the 25consumer's identity before termination of the contract online 26shall not be prevented from terminating the contract offline   SB3380- 9 -LRB104 19662 SPS 33111 b1using another method. 2    (b-20) It is a violation of this Act for any person, firm, 3partnership, association, or corporation that sells or offers 4to sell any products or services to a consumer pursuant to a 5contract, where such contract automatically renews unless the 6consumer terminates the contract, to charge the consumer or 7the consumer's account following an increase in price, or a 8price higher than what was disclosed in the contract's 9automatic renewal offer terms, without either:10        (1) obtaining the consumer's consent to the increased 11    price before the increase in price occurs; or12        (2) allowing the consumer to cancel the contract 13    anytime within at least 7 days after the charge is 14    assessed to the consumer or the consumer's account and 15    refunding the consumer in the amount equivalent to the 16    price of the remaining term of the service, at the time of 17    the cancellation, on a pro rata basis.18    (b-25) It is a violation of this Act for any person, firm, 19partnership, association, or corporation that sells or offers 20to sell any products or services to a consumer pursuant to a 21contract, where such contract automatically renews, to impose 22unreasonable or unlawful conditions upon consumer's ability to 23cancel or refuse to acknowledge, obstruct or unreasonably 24delay cancellation requested or attempts to request 25cancellation by a consumer. For the purposes of this 26subsection, "unreasonable or unlawful conditions" include, but   SB3380- 10 -LRB104 19662 SPS 33111 b1are not limited to, hanging up on consumers who call to cancel, 2providing false information about how to cancel, 3misrepresenting the consequences or costs of cancellation, or 4misrepresenting the reasons for delays in processing 5cancellation requests. 6    (c) A person, firm, partnership, association, or 7corporation will not be liable for a violation of this Act or 8the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act if 9such person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation 10demonstrates that, as part of its routine business practice:11        (i) it has established and implemented written 12    procedures to comply with this Act and enforces compliance 13    with the procedures;14        (ii) any failure to comply with this Act is the result 15    of error; and16        (iii) where an error has caused a failure to comply 17    with this Act, it provides a full refund or credit for all 18    amounts billed to or paid by the consumer from the date of 19    the renewal until the date of the termination of the 20    account, or the date of the subsequent notice of renewal, 21    whichever occurs first. 22(Source: P.A. 102-517, eff. 1-1-22; 103-70, eff. 1-1-24; 23103-919, eff. 1-1-25.)